pt-PT: Tipo de conector elétrico: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; 5 pinos; 6 pinos; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Estilo Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Estilo Bosch EV6/USCAR; Conectores de topo; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Sem conector (fios nus); Conector plug-in OEM; Fios tipo pigtail; Terminal em anel; Terminais em anel; Requer soldadura; Terminal de forquilha; Terminais de forquilha; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Outro
es: Tipo de conector eléctrico: 2 pines; 3 pines; 4 pines; 5 pines; 6 pines; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Estilo Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Estilo Bosch EV6/USCAR; Conectores de empalme; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Sin conector (cables pelados); Conector enchufable OEM; Cables pigtail; Terminal de anillo; Terminales de anillo; Requiere soldadura; Terminal de espada; Terminales de espada; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Otro
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อไฟฟ้า: 2 พิน; 3 พิน; 4 พิน; 5 พิน; 6 พิน; AMP/Tyco Superseal; สไตล์ Bosch EV1/Jetronic; สไตล์ Bosch EV6/USCAR; ขั้วต่อแบบชน; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; ไม่มีขั้วต่อ (สายไฟเปลือย); ขั้วต่อปลั๊กอิน OEM; สายไฟแบบ Pigtail; ขั้วต่อแบบวงแหวน; ขั้วต่อแบบวงแหวน; ต้องบัดกรี; ขั้วต่อหางปลาแฉก; ขั้วต่อหางปลาแฉก; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος ηλεκτρικού συνδέσμου: 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; 5-pin; 6-pin; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Τύπου Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Τύπου Bosch EV6/USCAR; Ενωτικά καλωδίων (butt connectors); Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Χωρίς σύνδεσμο (γυμνά καλώδια); Σύνδεσμος plug-in OEM; Καλώδια pigtail; Δακτυλιοειδής ακροδέκτης; Δακτυλιοειδείς ακροδέκτες; Απαιτείται συγκόλληση; Διχαλωτός ακροδέκτης (spade); Διχαλωτοί ακροδέκτες; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Άλλο
nb: Elektrisk tilkoblingstype: 2-pins; 3-pins; 4-pins; 5-pins; 6-pins; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic-stil; Bosch EV6/USCAR-stil; Skjøtehylser; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Ingen kontakt (bare ledere); OEM-pluggkontakt; Pigtail-ledninger; Ringkabelsko; Ringkabelsko; Krever lodding; Spadekabelsko; Spadekabelsko; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Annet
tr: Elektrik konnektörü tipi: 2 pimli; 3 pimli; 4 pimli; 5 pimli; 6 pimli; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic stili; Bosch EV6/USCAR stili; Uç uca eklemeli konnektörler; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Konnektör yok (açık uçlu kablo); OEM geçmeli konnektör; Kısa kablo uçları; Halka terminal; Halka terminaller; Lehim gerektirir; Maça terminali; Maça terminalleri; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Diğer
lt-LT: Elektrinės jungties tipas: 2 kontaktų; 3 kontaktų; 4 kontaktų; 5 kontaktų; 6 kontaktų; AMP / Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1 / Jetronic tipo; Bosch EV6 / USCAR tipo; Sandūrinės jungtys; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Be jungties (pliki laidai); OEM kištukinė jungtis; Kištukai su laidais; Žiedinis antgalis; Žiediniai antgaliai; Reikia lituoti; Plokščiasis antgalis; Plokštieji antgaliai; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Kita
hu: Elektromos csatlakozó típusa: 2 tűs; 3 tűs; 4 tűs; 5 tűs; 6 tűs; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic stílusú; Bosch EV6/USCAR stílusú; Toldócsatlakozók; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Nincs csatlakozó (csupasz vezetékek); OEM dugaszolható csatlakozó; Pigtail vezetékek; Gyűrűs saru; Gyűrűs saruk; Forrasztás szükséges; Villás saru; Villás saruk; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип електрически конектор: С 2 пина; С 3 пина; С 4 пина; С 5 пина; С 6 пина; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Стил Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Стил Bosch EV6/USCAR; Челни конектори; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Без конектор (голи кабели); OEM plug-in конектор; Изводи pigtail; Пръстеновидна клема; Пръстеновидни клеми; Изисква се запояване; Плоска клема; Плоски клеми; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Други
cs: Typ elektrického konektoru: 2pinový; 3pinový; 4pinový; 5pinový; 6pinový; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1 / styl Jetronic; Bosch EV6 / styl USCAR; Lisovací spojky; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Bez konektoru (holé vodiče); OEM zásuvný konektor; Vodiče pigtail; Kabelové oko; Kabelová oka; Vyžaduje pájení; Vidlicová koncovka; Vidlicové koncovky; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului electric: Cu 2 pini; Cu 3 pini; Cu 4 pini; Cu 5 pini; Cu 6 pini; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Tip Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Tip Bosch EV6/USCAR; Conectori cap la cap; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Fără conector (fire libere); Conector plug-in OEM; Fire cu conector (pigtail); Terminal inelar; Terminale inelare; Necesită lipire; Terminal tip papuc; Terminale tip papuc; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Altele
zh-CN: 电气连接器类型: 2 针; 3 针; 4 针; 5 针; 6 针; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic 款式; Bosch EV6/USCAR 款式; 对接连接器; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; 无连接器（裸导线）; OEM 插入式连接器; 尾纤导线; 环形端子; 环形端子; 需要焊接; 铲形端子; 铲形端子; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; 其他
fi: Sähköliittimen tyyppi: 2-nastainen; 3-nastainen; 4-nastainen; 5-nastainen; 6-nastainen; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1 / Jetronic -tyylinen; Bosch EV6 / USCAR -tyylinen; Puskuliittimet; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Ei liitintä (paljaat johdot); OEM-pistokeliitin; Pigtail-johdot; Rengasliitin; Rengasliittimet; Vaatii juottamisen; Lattaliitin; Lattaliittimet; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Muu
ja: 電気コネクタータイプ: 2ピン; 3ピン; 4ピン; 5ピン; 6ピン; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronicスタイル; Bosch EV6/USCARスタイル; バットコネクター; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; コネクターなし (リード線のみ); OEMプラグインコネクター; ピグテールリード; リング端子; リング端子; はんだ付けが必要; 圧着端子; 圧着端子; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; その他
sk-SK: Typ elektrického konektora: 2-kolíkový; 3-kolíkový; 4-kolíkový; 5-kolíkový; 6-kolíkový; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Štýl Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Štýl Bosch EV6/USCAR; Lisovacie spojky; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Bez konektora (holé vodiče); Zásuvný OEM konektor; Pigtail vodiče; Očková svorka; Očkové svorky; Vyžaduje sa spájkovanie; Vidlicová svorka; Vidlicové svorky; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de conector elétrico: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; 4 pinos; 5 pinos; 6 pinos; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Estilo Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Estilo Bosch EV6/USCAR; Conectores de emenda; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Sem conector (fios desencapados); Conector plug-in OEM; Fios pigtail; Terminal olhal; Terminais olhal; Requer solda; Terminal forquilha; Terminais forquilha; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta električnega priključka: 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; 5-pinski; 6-pinski; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/slog Jetronic; Bosch EV6/slog USCAR; Čelne spojke; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Brez priključka (gole žice); Vtični priključek OEM; Priključni kabli; Obročasti priključek; Obročasti priključki; Potrebno spajkanje; Viličasti priključek; Viličasti priključki; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Drugo
en: Electrical connector type: 2-pin; 3-pin; 4-pin; 5-pin; 6-pin; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic style; Bosch EV6/USCAR style; Butt connectors; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; No connector (bare leads); OEM plug-in connector; Pigtail leads; Ring terminal; Ring terminals; Solder required; Spade terminal; Spade terminals; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Other
ko: 전기 커넥터 유형: 2핀; 3핀; 4핀; 5핀; 6핀; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic 스타일; Bosch EV6/USCAR 스타일; 맞대기 커넥터; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; 커넥터 없음(베어 리드); OEM 플러그인 커넥터; 피그테일 리드; 링 단자; 링 단자; 납땜 필요; 스페이드 단자; 스페이드 단자; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; 웨더팩; 기타
sv: Elektrodkopplingstyp: 2-stifts; 3-stifts; 4-stifts; 5-stifts; 6-stifts; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic-stil; Bosch EV6/USCAR-stil; Skarvklämmor; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Ingen kontakt (lösa kablar); OEM-instickskontakt; Pigtail-kablar; Ringkabelsko; Ringkabelskor; Lödning krävs; Spadkabelsko; Spadkabelskor; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Övrigt
fr: Type de connecteur électrique: 2 broches; 3 broches; 4 broches; 5 broches; 6 broches; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Style Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Style Bosch EV6/USCAR; Connecteurs bout à bout; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Sans connecteur (fils dénudés); Connecteur enfichable d’origine; Fils en queue de cochon; Cosse à anneau; Cosses à anneau; Soudure requise; Cosse à fourche; Cosses à fourche; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Autre
it: Tipo di connettore elettrico: 2 pin; 3 pin; 4 pin; 5 pin; 6 pin; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Stile Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Stile Bosch EV6/USCAR; Connettori di testa; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Nessun connettore (fili scoperti); Connettore plug-in OEM; Fili pigtail; Terminale a occhiello; Terminali a occhiello; Saldatura richiesta; Terminale a forcella; Terminali a forcella; Micro Timer TE Connectivity; Weather Pack; Altro
ru: Тип электрического разъема: 2-контактный; 3-контактный; 4-контактный; 5-контактный; 6-контактный; AMP/Tyco Superseal; В стиле Bosch EV1/Jetronic; В стиле Bosch EV6/USCAR; Стыковые соединители; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Без разъема (голые провода); Оригинальный разъем (OEM); Гибкие выводы (pigtail); Кольцевая клемма; Кольцевые клеммы; Требуется пайка; Вилочная клемма; Вилочные клеммы; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Другое
da: Elektrisk stiktype: 2-bens; 3-bens; 4-bens; 5-bens; 6-bens; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic-stil; Bosch EV6/USCAR-stil; Stødsamlemuffer; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Intet stik (blottede ledninger); OEM plug-in-stik; Pigtail-ledninger; Ringkabelsko; Ringkabelsko; Kræver lodning; Spadekabelsko; Spadekabelsko; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta električnog priključka: 2-pinski; 3-pinski; 4-pinski; 5-pinski; 6-pinski; AMP/Tyco Superseal; U stilu Bosch EV1 / Jetronic; U stilu Bosch EV6 / USCAR; Čeone spojnice; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Bez konektora (gole žice); OEM utični konektor; Pigtail vodovi; Prstenasta stopica; Prstenaste stopice; Potrebno lemljenje; Viličasta stopica; Viličaste stopice; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Ostalo
de: Typ des elektrischen Steckverbinders: 2-polig; 3-polig; 4-polig; 5-polig; 6-polig; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic-Stil; Bosch EV6/USCAR-Stil; Stoßverbinder; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Kein Stecker (blanke Kabel); OEM-Steckverbinder; Pigtail-Kabel; Ringkabelschuh; Ringkabelschuhe; Löten erforderlich; Flachstecker; Flachstecker; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Sonstige
pl: Typ złącza elektrycznego: 2-pinowe; 3-pinowe; 4-pinowe; 5-pinowe; 6-pinowe; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Styl Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Styl Bosch EV6/USCAR; Złącza czołowe; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Brak złącza (gołe przewody); Złącze wtykowe OEM; Przewody typu pigtail; Złącze oczkowe; Złącza oczkowe; Wymagane lutowanie; Złącze widełkowe; Złącza widełkowe; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Inne
nl: Type elektrishe connector: 2-pins; 3-pins; 4-pins; 5-pins; 6-pins; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic-stijl; Bosch EV6/USCAR-stijl; Stootverbinders; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Geen connector (kale draden); OEM-plug-in-connector; Pigtail-draden; Ringkabelschoen; Ringkabelschoenen; Solderen vereist; Schuifkabelschoen; Vorkkabelschoenen; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Overige
zh-TW: 電動連接器類型: 2 針; 3 針; 4 針; 5 針; 6 針; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Bosch EV1/Jetronic 樣式; Bosch EV6/USCAR 樣式; 對接連接器; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; 無連接器 (裸線); OEM 插入式連接器; 引線; 環形端子; 環形端子; 需焊接; 鏟形端子; 鏟形端子; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; 其他
vi: Loại đầu nối điện: 2 chân; 3 chân; 4 chân; 5 chân; 6 chân; AMP/Tyco Superseal; Kiểu Bosch EV1/Jetronic; Kiểu Bosch EV6/USCAR; Đầu nối đối đầu; Deutsch DT; Deutsch DTM; Deutsch DTP; Metri-Pack 150; Metri-Pack 280; Không có đầu nối (dây trần); Đầu cắm OEM; Dây dẫn pigtail; Đầu cốt khuyên; Đầu cốt khuyên; Cần hàn; Đầu cốt chĩa; Đầu cốt chĩa; TE Connectivity Micro Timer; Weather Pack; Khác